Vermont, session 2025-2026, H494.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Legislative Intent * * *
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that of the $111,965,288.44
authorized in this act, not more than $61,969,761.44 shall be appropriated in
the first year of the biennium, and the remainder shall be appropriated in the
second year.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that in the second year of the
biennium, any amendments to the appropriations or authorities granted in this
act shall take the form of the Capital Construction and State Bonding
Adjustment Bill. It is the intent of the General Assembly that unless otherwise
indicated, all appropriations in this act are subject to capital budget adjustment.
Sec. 2. STATE BUILDINGS
(a) The following sums are appropriated to the Department of Buildings
and General Services, and the Commissioner is authorized to direct funds
appropriated in this section to the projects contained in this section; however,
no project shall be canceled unless the Chairs of the Senate Committee on
Institutions and the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions are
notified before that action is taken.
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 2 of 30
2025
(b) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026:
(1) Statewide, major maintenance: $6,493,401.00
(2) Statewide, three-acre parcel stormwater compliance: $1,500,000.00
(3) Statewide, Art in State Buildings Program: $75,000.00
(4) Rutland, Asa Bloomer Building roof repair and sewage system
upgrades: $1,500,000.00
(5) Rutland, multimodal garage renovation: $600,000.00
(6) Middlesex, Print and Postal uninterruptable power supply upgrade:
$58,279.44
(7) Waterbury, State Office Complex historic core roof replacement:
$2,000,000.00
(8) Burlington, 32 Cherry St. parking garage repairs: $1,500,000.00
(c) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027:
(1) Statewide, major maintenance: $8,500,000.00
(2) Statewide, planning, reuse, and contingency: $250,000.00
(3) Statewide, physical security enhancements: $250,000.00
(4) Statewide, three-acre parcel stormwater compliance: $1,100,000.00
(5) Statewide, Art in State Buildings Program: $75,000.00
(6) Pittsford, Academy firing range upgrades $200,000.00
(7) Montpelier, State House replacement of historic interior finishes:
$50,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 3 of 30
2025
(8) Montpelier, 120 State Street HVAC – steam lines interior
renovation: $2,000,000.00
(9) Middlesex, Vermont State Archives roof replacement, main
building: $1,000,000.00
(10) Waterbury, State Office Complex historic core roof replacement:
$2,000,000.00
(11) Burlington, 32 Cherry St. parking garage repairs:
$500,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2026 $13,726,680.44
Appropriation – FY 2027 $15,925,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 2 $28,951,680.44
Sec. 3. HUMAN SERVICES
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Department of
Buildings and General Services for the Agency of Human Services for the
following projects:
(1) Statewide, planning, design, and construction for HVAC system
upgrades at correctional facilities: $4,000,000.00
(2) Statewide, accessibility upgrades at correctional facilities:
$2,000,000.00
(3) Statewide, correctional facility safety and security upgrades:
$225,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 4 of 30
2025
(4) St. Johnsbury, Northeast Correctional Complex (NECC) door
control system replacements: $1,000,000.00
(5) St. Albans, Northwest State Regional Correctional Facility
(NWSCF) roof replacement: $1,000,000.00
(b) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027 to the Department of
Buildings and General Services for the Agency of Human Services for the
following projects:
(1) Statewide, planning, design, and construction for HVAC system
upgrades at correctional facilities: $1,000,000.00
(2) Statewide, correctional facility safety and security upgrades:
$200,000.00
(3) Rutland, Marble Valley Regional Correctional Facility (MVRCF)
door control system replacements: $500,000.00
(4) St. Johnsbury, Northeast Correctional Complex (NECC) door
control system replacements: $2,600,000.00
(5) Newport, Northern State Correctional Facility (NSCF) sprinkler
system upgrades: $500,000.00
(c) Notwithstanding 29 V.S.A. § 152(a)(20), the Commissioner of
Buildings and General Services is authorized to transfer any unexpended
project balances between the amount appropriated in subdivision (a)(5) of this
section and the amount appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec.
3(b)(1), as amended by 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 162, Sec. 3 (NWSCF,
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 5 of 30
2025
booking expansion, planning, design, and construction), and the Commissioner
of Finance and Management may release the amount notwithstanding 2023
Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 27(a) (NWSCF; funding request for federal
detainees).
Appropriation – FY 2026 $8,225,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $4,800,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 3 $13,025,000.00
Sec. 4. COMMERCE AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development for the following projects:
(1) Major maintenance at statewide historic sites: $550,000.00
(2) Vermont Underwater Historic Preserves: $46,000.00
(3) Roadside historic site markers: $25,000.00
(4) Bennington, Battle Monument, maintenance of safety fencing,
restoration, planning, and design: $425,000.00
(b) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027 to the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development for the following projects:
(1) Major maintenance at statewide historic sites: $550,000.00
(2) Vermont Underwater Historic Preserves: $46,000.00
(3) Roadside historic site markers: $25,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2026 $1,046,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $621,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 6 of 30
2025
Total Appropriation – Section 4 $1,667,000.00
Sec. 5. GRANT PROGRAMS
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 for the Building
Communities Grants established in 24 V.S.A. chapter 137:
(1) To the Agency of Commerce and Community Development,
Division for Historic Preservation, for the Historic Preservation Grant
Program: $300,000.00
(2) To the Agency of Commerce and Community Development,
Division for Historic Preservation, for the Historic Barns Preservation Grant
Program: $300,000.00
(3) To the Vermont Council on the Arts for the Cultural Facilities Grant
Program, the sum of which may be used to match funds that may be made
available from the National Endowment for the Arts, provided that all capital
funds are made available to the Cultural Facilities Grant Program:
$300,000.00
(4) To the Department of Buildings and General Services for the
Recreational Facilities Grant Program: $300,000.00
(5) To the Department of Buildings and General Services for the Human
Services and Educational Facilities Competitive Grant Program: $300,000.00
(6) To the Department of Buildings and General Services for the
Regional Economic Development Grant Program: $300,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 7 of 30
2025
(7) To the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets for the Agricultural
Fairs and Field Days Capital Projects Competitive Grant Program:
$300,000.00
(b) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027 for the Building
Communities Grants established in 24 V.S.A. chapter 137:
(1) To the Agency of Commerce and Community Development,
Division for Historic Preservation, for the Historic Preservation Grant
Program: $300,000.00
(2) To the Agency of Commerce and Community Development,
Division for Historic Preservation, for the Historic Barns Preservation Grant
Program: $300,000.00
(3) To the Vermont Council on the Arts for the Cultural Facilities Grant
Program, the sum of which may be used to match funds that may be made
available from the National Endowment for the Arts, provided that all capital
funds are made available to the Cultural Facilities Grant Program:
$300,000.00
(4) To the Department of Buildings and General Services for the
Recreational Facilities Grant Program: $300,000.00
(5) To the Department of Buildings and General Services for the Human
Services and Educational Facilities Competitive Grant Program: $300,000.00
(6) To the Department of Buildings and General Services for the
Regional Economic Development Grant Program: $300,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 8 of 30
2025
(7) To the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets for the Agricultural
Fairs and Field Days Capital Projects Competitive Grant Program:$300,000.00
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the sums appropriated in
subdivisions (a)(5) and (b)(5) of this section be equally allocated between
grants for human services and grants for educational facilities.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $2,100,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $2,100,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 5 $4,200,000.00
Sec. 6. VETERANS’ HOME
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Vermont
Veterans’ Home for the following projects:
(1) Replacement of air handlers: $710,000.00
(2) Expansion of laundry facilities: $340,000.00
(b) The Chief Executive Officer of the Vermont Veterans’ Home is
authorized to transfer any unexpended project balances between the amounts
appropriated in subdivisions (a)(1)–(2) of this section.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $1,050,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 6 $1,050,000.00
Sec. 7. UNIVERSITY OF VERMONT
(a) The sum of $1,500,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the University
of Vermont for construction, renovations, and major maintenance.
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 9 of 30
2025
(b) The sum of $1,500,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2027 to the University
of Vermont for the projects described in subsection (a) of this section.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $1,500,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $1,500,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 7 $3,000,000.00
Sec. 8. VERMONT STATE COLLEGES
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Vermont State
Colleges for the following projects:
(1) Statewide, construction, renovations, and major maintenance:
$1,500,000.00
(2) Johnson, the central heating plant replacement: $1,500,000.00
(b) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027 to the Vermont State
Colleges for the following projects:
(1) Statewide, construction, renovations, and major maintenance:
$1,500,000.00
(2) Johnson, central heating plant replacement: $3,500,000.00
(c) For the amounts appropriated in subdivisions (a)(2) and (b)(2) of this
section, the Vermont State Colleges shall work with Efficiency Vermont to
develop a central heating plant replacement.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $3,000,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $5,000,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 8 $8,000,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 10 of 30
2025
Sec. 9. NATURAL RESOURCES
(a) The sum of $500,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Environmental Conservation for dam
safety and hydrology projects.
(b) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation for the
following projects:
(1) Park infrastructure and rehabilitation, improvement, and three-acre
rule compliance: $3,500,000.00
(2) Public lands access infrastructure: $700,000.00
(c) The sum of $1,105,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Fish and Wildlife for major
maintenance and infrastructure projects.
(d) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Environmental Conservation for the
following projects:
(1) State match, drinking water supply, Drinking Water State Revolving
Fund: $590,000.00
(2) Dam safety and hydrology projects: $500,000.00
(e) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation for the
following projects:
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 11 of 30
2025
(1) Park infrastructure and rehabilitation, improvement, and three-acre
rule compliance: $2,500,000.00
(2) Public lands access infrastructure: $700,000.00
(f) The sum of $1,029,360.00 is appropriated in FY 2027 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Fish and Wildlife for major
maintenance and infrastructure projects.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $5,805,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $5,319,360.00
Total Appropriation – Section 9 $11,124,360.00
Sec. 10. CLEAN WATER INITIATIVES
(a) The sum of $3,000,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the Agency of
Agriculture, Food and Markets for water quality grants and contracts.
(b) The sum of $4,000,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Environmental Conservation for
municipal pollution control grants.
(c) The sum of $200,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the Agency of
Natural Resources for the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation for
water quality improvements to forest access roads.
(d)(1) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Vermont
Housing and Conservation Board for the following projects:
(A) Agricultural water quality projects: $800,000.00
(B) Land conservation and water quality projects: $2,000,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 12 of 30
2025
(2) A grant issued under subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection:
(A) shall not be considered a State grant under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215,
subchapter 3 for purposes of calculating the maximum amount of a State water
quality assistance award under 6 V.S.A. § 4824 or 4826; and
(B) may be used to satisfy a grant recipient’s cost-share
requirements.
(e) The sum of $10,000,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2027 to the Agency
of Natural Resources for the Department of Environmental Conservation for
clean water implementation projects.
(f) In FY 2026 and FY 2027, any agency that receives funding from this
section shall consult with the State Treasurer to ensure that the projects are
capital eligible.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $10,000,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $10,000,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 10 $20,000,000.00
Sec. 11. MILITARY
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Military
Department for the following projects:
(1) Major maintenance, renovations, and ADA compliance at State
armories: $1,272,838.00
(2) Northwest Regional Readiness Center, planning and design:
$1,343,333.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 13 of 30
2025
(b) The sum of $1,310,167.00 is appropriated in FY 2027 to the Military
Department for major maintenance, renovations, and ADA compliance at State
armories.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $2,616,171.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $1,310,167.00
Total Appropriation – Section 11 $3,926,338.00
Sec. 12. AGRICULTURE, FOOD AND MARKETS
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Department of
Buildings and General Services for the Agency of Agriculture, Food and
Markets for the following projects:
(1) Renovations to the Vermont Building at the Eastern States
Exposition: $1,500,000.00
(2) Upgrades to the heat systems serving the Vermont State University
Randolph Campus and the Vermont Agricultural and Environmental
Laboratory: $3,500,000.00
(b) The sum of $1,500,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2027 to the
Department of Buildings and General Services for the Agency of Agriculture,
Food and Markets for renovations to the Vermont Building at the Eastern
States Exposition.
(c) For the amount appropriated in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the
Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall negotiate the
maintenance of propane summer boilers and update the memorandum of
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 14 of 30
2025
understanding with Vermont State University. The Commissioner of
Buildings and General Services is additionally authorized to transfer any
unexpended project balances between the amount appropriated in subdivision
(a)(2) of this section and the amounts appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves
No. 69, Sec. 12(b)(1) (Vermont Agriculture and Environmental Laboratory
Heat Plant, construction).
Appropriation – FY 2026 $5,000,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $1,500,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 12 $6,500,000.00
Sec. 13. PUBLIC SAFETY
(a) The sum of $2,000,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the
Department of Buildings and General Services for the Department of Public
Safety for Rutland Field Station.
(b) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2027 to the Department of
Buildings and General Services for the Department of Public Safety for the
following projects:
(1) Shaftsbury Field Station, land acquisition, planning, and design:
$150,000.00
(2) Rutland Field Station: $1,645,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2026 $2,000,000.00
Appropriation – FY 2027 $1,795,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 13 $3,795,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 15 of 30
2025
Sec. 14. JUDICIARY
(a) The following sums are appropriated in FY 2026 to the Judiciary for the
following projects:
(1) Woodstock Courthouse, purchase and installation of backup power
system: $100,000.00
(2) Essex County Courthouse, connector and security upgrades:
$3,685,910.00
(3) Lamoille County Courthouse, purchase and installation of backup
power system: $190,000.00
(b) The sum of $1,100,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the
Department of Buildings and General Services for the Judiciary for
renovations at the Windsor County Courthouse in White River Junction.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $5,075,910.00
Total Appropriation – Section 14 $5,075,910.00
Sec. 15. VERMONT RURAL FIRE PROTECTION
(a) The sum of $125,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the Department
of Public Safety for the Vermont Rural Fire Protection Task Force for the dry
hydrant program.
(b) The sum of $125,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2027 to the Department
of Public Safety for the Vermont Rural Fire Protection Task Force for the
project described in subsection (a) of this section.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $125,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 16 of 30
2025
Appropriation – FY 2027 $125,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 15 $250,000.00
Sec. 16. VERMONT HISTORICAL SOCIETY
The sum of $700,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2026 to the Vermont
Historical Society to mitigate water infiltration at the roof, foundation, and
basement of the Spaulding Building in Barre.
Appropriation – FY 2026 $700,000.00
Total Appropriation – Section 16 $700,000.00
* * * Funding * * *
Sec. 17. REALLOCATION OF FUNDS; TRANSFER OF FUNDS
(a) The following sums are reallocated to the Department of Buildings
and General Services from prior capital appropriations to defray expenditures
authorized in Secs. 2–16 of this act:
(1) of the amount appropriated in 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 42, Sec.
2(c)(5), as amended by 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 139, Sec. 1 (108 Cherry
Street, parking garage repairs): $399,803.36
(2) of the amount appropriated in 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 50, Sec.
2(c)(18), as amended by 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 180, Sec. 2 (108
Cherry Street, parking garage repairs): $37,519.86
(3) of the amount appropriated in in 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 42,
Sec. 13(a), as amended by 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 139, Sec. 9
(Middlesex Field Station): $371.89
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 17 of 30
2025
(4) of the amount appropriated in 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 50, Sec.
12(a)(2) (Middlesex Field Station): $18,309.45
(5) of the amount appropriated in 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 50, Sec.
12(c), as amended by 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 180, Sec. 10, as further
amended by 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 35 (Williston Public Safety
Field Station): $2,220,099.10
(6) of the amount appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec.
2(b)(3) (statewide, planning, reuse, and contingency): $425,000.00
(7) of the amount appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec.
2(c)(7) (Northern State Correctional Facility, planning and construction for
the boiler replacement): $1,000,000.00
(8) of the amount appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec.
3(b)(5), as added by 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 162, Sec. 3 (South
Burlington, justice-involved men, feasibility study for reentry
facility): $125,000.00
(9) of the amounts appropriated in 2015 Acts and Resolves No. 26,
Sec. 2(b) (various projects): $58,279.44
(10) of the amounts appropriated in 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84,
Sec. 2(b) (various projects): $23,237.47
(11) of the amounts appropriated in 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 42,
Sec. 2(b) (various projects): $73,784.44
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 18 of 30
2025
(b) The following sums appropriated to the Agency of Commerce and
Community Development from prior capital appropriations are reallocated to
defray expenditures authorized in Secs. 2–16 of this act:
(1) of the amount appropriated in 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 42, Sec.
5(c)(3), as amended by 2020 Acts & Resolves No. 139, Sec. 3 (Highgate
Native American Cemetery): $12,042.00
(2) of the amount appropriated in 2017 Acts & Resolves No. 84, Sec.
11(m), as added by 2018 Acts and Resolves No. 190, Sec. 8 (Downtown
Transportation Fund pilot project): $67,000.00
(c) The following sums appropriated to the Agency of Transportation
from prior capital appropriations are reallocated to defray expenditures
authorized in Secs. 2–16 of this act:
(1) of the amount appropriated in 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 139,
Sec. 12(b)(1) (Lamoille Valley Rail Trail): $112.31
(2) of the amount appropriated in 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84, Sec.
11(c) (Municipal Mitigation Program): $19,342.69
(3) of the amount appropriated in 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84, Sec.
11(l)(2), as added by 2018 Acts and Resolves No. 190, Sec. 8 (Better Roads
Grant Program): $41,238.46
(d) Of the amount appropriated to the Department of Buildings and
General Services in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 2(b)(4)
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 19 of 30
2025
(Bennington, Battle Monument, construction of safety fencing), $419,000.00
is reallocated to defray expenditures authorized in Sec. 4 of this act.
(e) Of the amount appropriated to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and
Markets in 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84, Sec. 11(e)(1)(B), as added by
2018 Acts and Resolves No. 190, Sec. 8 (phosphorus removal equipment),
$115,000.00 is reallocated to defray expenditures authorized in Secs. 2–16 of
this act.
(f) Of the amount appropriated to the Agency of Education in 2021 Acts
and Resolves No. 50, Sec. 6(a) (funding emergency projects), $19,549.00 is
reallocated to defray expenditures authorized in Secs. 2–16 of this act.
(g) Of the amount appropriated to the Agency of Natural Resources for
the Department of Environmental Conservation in 2017 Acts and Resolves
No. 84, Sec. 11(b)(2) (ecosystem restoration and protection), $249.01 is
reallocated to defray expenditures authorized in Secs. 2–16 of this act.
(h) Of the amount appropriated from the Capital Infrastructure
subaccount of the Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments to the
Vermont Veterans’ Home in 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
B.1103(a)(7) and authorized in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 18(d)(7)
(design for the renovation of the Brandon and Cardinal units), $1,500,000.00
is reallocated to defray expenditures authorized in Sec. 19 of this act.
(i) Of the amount appropriated from the Capital Infrastructure subaccount
of the Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments to the Department of
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 20 of 30
2025
Buildings and General Services in 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec.
B.1103(a)(9) and authorized in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec.
18(d)(10) (111 State Street; renovation of the stack area), $200,000.00 is
reallocated to defray expenditures authorized in Sec. 19 of this act.
(j) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 701a(c)(2), the Department of Buildings
and General Services may retain for the same purposes the unexpended
amounts not reallocated in this act that were appropriated in the following
capital construction acts:
(1) 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84, Sec. 13(b)(2), as added by 2018
Acts and Resolves No. 190, Sec. 10 (East Cottage); and
(2) 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 42, Sec. 2(b) (various projects).
(k) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 701a(c)(2), the Agency of Agriculture,
Food and Markets may retain for the same purposes the unexpended amount
not reallocated in this act appropriated in 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84,
Sec. 11(e)(1)(B), as added by 2018 Acts and Resolves No. 190, Sec. 8
(phosphorus removal equipment).
(l) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 701a(c)(2), the Department of
Environmental Conservation may retain for the same purposes the
unexpended amounts not reallocated in this act that were appropriated in the
following capital construction acts:
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 21 of 30
2025
(1) 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84, Sec. 11(f)(2)(A), as added by
2018 Acts and Resolves No. 190, Sec. 8 (Standard EcoSystem Restoration
and Protection programs);
(2) 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 42, Sec. 11(b) (pollution control); and
(3) 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 42, Sec. 10(a)(2) (dam safety and
hydrology projects).
(m) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 701a(c)(2), the Agency of
Transportation may retain for the same purposes the unexpended amounts not
reallocated in this act that were appropriated in the following capital
construction acts:
(1) 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84, Sec. 11(c) (Municipal Mitigation
Program); and
(2) 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 84, Sec. 11(l), as added by 2018 Acts
and Resolves No. 190, Sec. 8 (Municipal Mitigation Program).
Bonded Dollars $5,074,938.48
Cash $1,700,000.00
Total Reallocations and Transfers – Section 17 $6,774,938.48
Sec. 18. GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS AND APPROPRIATIONS
(a) The State Treasurer is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in
the amount of $100,000,000.00 for the purpose of funding the appropriations
made in Secs. 2–16 of this act. The State Treasurer, with the approval of the
Governor, shall determine the appropriate form and maturity of the bonds
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 22 of 30
2025
authorized by this section consistent with the underlying nature of the
appropriation to be funded.
(b) The State Treasurer is authorized to issue additional general obligation
bonds in the amount of $6,890,350.00 that were previously appropriated but
unissued under 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, as amended by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 162, for the purpose of funding the appropriations in this act.
Total Revenues – Section 18 $106,890,350.00
Sec. 19. FY 2026 AND 2027; CAPITAL PROJECTS; FY 2026
APPROPRIATIONS ACT; INTENT; AUTHORIZATIONS
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that in addition to the issuance
of general obligation bonds, eligible capital projects may be funded from the
Fund established in 32 V.S.A. § 1001b.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to authorize certain
capital projects eligible for funding by 32 V.S.A. § 1001b in this act but
appropriate the funds for these projects in the FY 2026 Appropriations Act. It
is also the intent of the General Assembly that the FY 2026 Appropriations Act
appropriate funds to the Fund established in 32 V.S.A. § 1001b for projects in
FY 2027.
(c) Authorizations; Capital Infrastructure subaccount. In FY 2026,
spending authority for the following capital projects from the Capital
Infrastructure subaccount of the Cash Fund for Capital and Essential
Investments are authorized as follows:
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 23 of 30
2025
(1) to the Department of Buildings and General Services for statewide
major maintenance: $1,506,599.00
(2) to the Department of Buildings and General Services for statewide
planning, reuse, and contingency: $250,000.00
(3) to the Department of Buildings and General Services for statewide
physical security enhancements: $250,000.00
(4) to the Department of Buildings and General Services for State House
repointing: $219,500.00
(5) to the Department of Buildings and General Services for an
uninterruptable power supply system for the Middlesex print and postal
facility: $250,000.00
(6) to the Department of Buildings and General Services for the
Judiciary for renovations at the Windsor County Courthouse in White River
Junction: $6,900,000.00
(7) to the Vermont Veterans’ Home for the design and construction of
the American unit: $1,500,000.00
(8) to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development for
infrastructure improvements that are either municipally leased for a term of at
least 30 years or municipally owned and that support the development of new
or rehabilitated housing, provided that a grant agreement shall be in place
between the State and the municipality prior to the release of funds:
$2,500,000.00
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 24 of 30
2025
(9) to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for the Lake Champlain
Walleye Association, Inc. to upgrade and repair the Walleye rearing,
restoration, and stocking infrastructure: $25,000.00
(10) to the Department of Public Safety for the Vermont Rural Fire
Protection Task Force for the dry hydrant program: $35,000.00
(d) Authorizations; Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments, and
Reserves subaccount. In FY 2026, spending authority is authorized from the
Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments, and Reserves subaccount of the
Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments to the Agency of Natural
Resources for the Department of Environmental Conservation for the State
match to the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act Drinking Water State
Revolving Fund and Clean Water State Revolving Fund, in accordance with
the provisions of 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.108(b), in the amount
of $14,500,000.00.
(e) Transfer. Notwithstanding 29 V.S.A. § 152(a)(20), the Commissioner
of Buildings and General Services is authorized to transfer any unexpended
project balances between the amount appropriated in subdivision (c)(7) of this
section and the amounts appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec.
15(b)(1) (emergency generator and boiler plant replacement).
* * * Policy * * *
* * * Capital Budgeting Process* * *
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 25 of 30
2025
Sec. 20. 32 V.S.A. § 701a is amended to read:
§ 701a. CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION BILL
* * *
(d)(1) On or before November 15 each year, the Commissioner of Finance
and Management shall require each entity to which spending authority has
been authorized by a capital construction act enacted in a legislative session
that was two or more years prior to the current legislative session to submit a
report on the current fund balances of each authorized project with unexpended
funds. The report shall include plans for the unexpended funds, any projects or
contracts the funds are assigned to, and an anticipated timeline for expending
the funds.
(2) On or before December 15 each year the third Tuesday of every
annual session, the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall submit in
a consolidated format the reports required by subdivision (1) of this subsection
to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate
Committee on Institutions.
* * *
Sec. 21. 32 V.S.A. § 310 is amended to read:
§ 310. FORM OF ANNUAL CAPITAL BUDGET AND 10-YEAR
CAPITAL PROGRAM PLAN
* * *
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 26 of 30
2025
(b) The capital budget request for the following biennium shall be
presented as the next increment of the 10-year plan. Elements of the plan shall
include:
* * *
(2) Comprehensive cost and financing assessment.
(A) Amounts appropriated and expended for the current fiscal year
and for the preceding fiscal year shall be indicated for capital programs and for
individual projects. For the five fiscal years preceding these, the assessment
shall include the aggregate amounts appropriated and expended for individual
projects, which amounts shall be categorized by funding type and presented in
a format that concisely displays the funding stream and project phases for each
individual project over time. The assessment shall indicate further the source
of funds for any project that required additional funding and a description of
any authorized projects that were delayed.
* * *
Sec. 22. 32 V.S.A. § 1001b is amended to read:
§ 1001b. CASH FUND FOR CAPITAL AND ESSENTIAL INVESTMENTS
* * *
(e) Spending authority. Any entity authorized to make expenditures from
the Capital Infrastructure subaccount shall have not more than two three years
from the end of the legislative session in which the act authorizing the
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 27 of 30
2025
expenditure was enacted to encumber the funds. Any remaining
unencumbered funds shall remain part of the Fund account.
Sec. 22a. CASH FUND; JOINT FISCAL OFFICE; REPORT
On or before December 15, 2025, the Joint Fiscal Office shall submit a
report to the Senate Committee on Institutions and the House Committee on
Corrections and Institutions on considerations for use of the Cash Fund for
Capital and Essential Investments under 32 V.S.A. § 1001b that:
(1) provides the historical context, including the economic rationale, for
the Cash Fund;
(2) compares financial management practices for expenditures made
through cash and through bonded dollars, including long-term financial
impacts;
(3) distinguishes between the intended uses of the Capital Infrastructure
subaccount and the Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments, and Reserves
subaccount;
(4) describes, for each year since the Cash Fund’s inception:
(A) the sources of funds; and
(B) the annual expenditures from the Capital Infrastructure
subaccount; and
(5) outlines the current legislative process by which appropriations are
made from the Cash Fund.
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 28 of 30
2025
* * * Buildings and General Services * * *
Sec. 23. TRANSFER OF RANDALL MEADOW PROPERTY IN THE
TOWN OF WATERBURY
Notwithstanding 29 V.S.A. § 166(b), the Commissioner of Buildings and
General Services is authorized to survey, subdivide, and transfer to the Town
of Waterbury the portion of land in the Waterbury State Office Complex
(Parcel ID # 69622111909 as designated on the Town of Waterbury’s Tax
Parcel Maps) that is commonly referred to as the “Randall Meadow,” provided
that the Commissioner may transfer the Randall Meadow property only once:
(1) the parcel has been subdivided to reflect stormwater management
needs of the Waterbury State Office Complex to the satisfaction of the
Commissioner;
(2) any permits required for transfer have been obtained; and
(3) the Commissioner and the Town of Waterbury have created a plan to
align the transfer with the current lease for the parcel.
Sec. 24. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 162, Sec. 27 is amended to read:
Sec. 27. CAPITOL COMPLEX FLOOD RECOVERY; SPECIAL
COMMITTEE
* * *
(c) The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall provide
quarterly updates to the Special Committee on the planning process for Capitol
Complex flood recovery and shall provide timely notification to the City of
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 29 of 30
2025
Montpelier and the Montpelier Commission for Recovery and Resilience of
alterations to proposals and plans for Capitol Complex flood recovery.
* * *
* * * Human Services * * *
Sec. 25. REPEAL
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 162, Sec. 31 (potential reuse of Chittenden
Regional Correctional Facility Site; feasibility; report) is repealed.
* * * Vermont Veterans’ Home * * *
Sec. 26. USE OF FEDERAL FUNDS; EMERGENCY GENERATOR AND
BOILER REPLACEMENT; ELEVATOR UPGRADE
If the Commissioner of Finance and Management offsets any capital funds
appropriated in 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 15 (b)(1)–(2) (emergency
generator and boiler plant replacement; elevator upgrade) with federal funds,
then any offset amounts shall be reused for future capital construction projects
as part of the capital budget process.
* * * Sergeant at Arms * * *
Sec. 27. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 15b, as added by 2024 Acts and
Resolves No. 162, Sec. 8, is amended to read:
Sec. 15b. SERGEANT AT ARMS
The sum of $100,000.00 is appropriated in FY 2025 to the Sergeant at Arms
for the following projects:
(1) the replacement of State House cafeteria furnishings; and
VT LEG #383936 v.1

No. 33 Page 30 of 30
2025
(2) the purchase and installation at the State House of an X-ray machine
designed to screen baggage.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 28. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 22, 2025
VT LEG #383936 v.1